Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.725, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4b. new text end new text begin Misclassification rates; partnership entity annual reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning March 1, 2026, and each March 1 thereafter, each partnership entity must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over labor the following information: new text end new text begin (1) an estimate of the number of workers experiencing misclassification; new text end new text begin (2) an estimate of the cost of misclassification to impacted workers; new text end new text begin (3) an estimate of impact on law-abiding competitors of employers that have misclassified employees; and new text end new text begin (4) an estimate of misclassification by industry to help guide partnership enforcement priorities. new text end new text begin (b) Based on the estimated misclassification rates and information required under paragraph (a), the following must also be included with the reports under paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) from the Department of Employment and Economic Development, an estimate of the impact to: new text end new text begin (i) the unemployment insurance trust fund; new text end new text begin (ii) the family and medical benefit insurance account; and new text end new text begin (iii) the tax and premium rates for those programs, as applicable; new text end new text begin (2) from the Department of Revenue, an estimate of the impact to: new text end new text begin (i) income tax collection; and new text end new text begin (ii) other government programs; and new text end new text begin (3) from the Department of Labor and Industry, an estimate of the impact to: new text end new text begin (i) the workers' compensation fund; and new text end new text begin (ii) workers' compensation insurance rates. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MISCLASSIFICATION FRAUD ANALYSIS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of labor and industry for misclassification fraud analysis. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for misclassification fraud analysis. new text end new text begin (c) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for misclassification fraud analysis. new text end new text begin (d) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce for misclassification fraud analysis. new text end new text begin (e) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the attorney general for misclassification fraud analysis. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Use of money. new text end new text begin Money appropriated under this section must be used for costs associated with estimating misclassification fraud rates and analyzing impacts to programs and funds overseen by the respective agencies that may be impacted by misclassification fraud as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 181.725, subdivision 4b. new text end